Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 44.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2014
71-222.02
Board of
Barber Examiners Fund; created; use; investment.

All
funds collected in the administration of the Barber Act shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Board of Barber Examiners Fund which
is hereby created and which shall be expended only for the administration
of the act, except that transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Board of Barber Examiners Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 27, p. 1327;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 68, p. 2387;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 73;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 44.

Fees, see sections 33-151 and 33-152.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.